Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1311] Appropriations for trust funds
of the department of education. Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, in any fiscal year, if the amount of revenues deposited into a trust
fund of the department of education exceeds the amount appropriated from that
fund for that year, the superintendent may approve expenditures in excess of
the amount appropriated, up to the amount by which revenues for that fund
exceed the appropriations from that fund for a fiscal year; provided that the
department shall submit a report annually to the governor and the legislature
of all expenditures in excess of each fund's appropriation for each fiscal
year. [L 2000, c 234, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next